Washington statutes.
RCW 18.265.020

License required—Liability insurance.

No person may practice dental therapy or represent himself or herself as a dental therapist without being licensed by the department under this chapter. Every person licensed to practice dental therapy in this state shall renew their license and comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, continuing education requirements, and fees provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The licensing fees for dental therapists may not be subsidized by other health professions. The department shall establish by rule mandatory continuing education requirements to be met by dental therapists applying for license renewal. A dental therapist must obtain liability insurance with coverage equivalent to that of the supervising dentist's liability insurance coverage.

[ 2023 c 460 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 460 ss 1-22: See note following RCW 18.265.005.